Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 10. HEALTH AND SAFETY OF ANIMALS

CHAPTER 821. TREATMENT AND DISPOSITION OF ANIMALS

SUBCHAPTER A. TREATMENT OF ANIMALS

Sec. 821.001. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "animal" includes every living nonhuman creature.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1593, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 821.002. TREATMENT OF IMPOUNDED ANIMALS. (a) A person who impounds or causes the impoundment of an animal under state law or municipal ordinance shall supply the animal with sufficient wholesome food and water during its confinement.

(b) If an animal impounded under Subsection (a) continues to be without necessary food and water for more than 12 successive hours, any person may enter the pound or corral as often as necessary to supply the animal with necessary food and water. That person may recover the reasonable cost of the food and water from the owner of the animal. The animal is not exempt from levy and sale on execution of a judgment issued to recover those costs.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 821.003. TREATMENT OF LIVE BIRDS. (a) This section applies to a person who receives live birds for transportation or for confinement:

(1) on wagons or stands;

(2) by a person who owns a grocery store, commission house, or other market house; or

(3) by any other person if the birds are to be closely confined.

(b) The person shall immediately place the birds in coops, crates, or cages that are made of open slats or wire on at least three sides and that are of a height so that the birds can stand upright without touching the top.

(c) The person shall keep clean water and suitable food in troughs or other receptacles in the coops, crates, or cages. The troughs or other receptacles must be easily accessible to the confined birds and must be placed so that the birds cannot defile their contents.

(d) The person shall keep the coops, crates, or cages in a clean and wholesome condition and may place in each coop, crate, or cage only the number of birds that have room to move around and to stand without crowding each other.

(e) The person may not expose the birds to undue heat or cold and shall immediately remove all injured, diseased, or dead birds from the coops, crates, or cages.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 821.004. KNOWLEDGE OR ACTS OF CORPORATE AGENT OR EMPLOYEE. The knowledge and acts of an agent or employee of a corporation in regard to an animal transported, owned, or used by or in the custody of the corporation are the knowledge and acts of the corporation.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER B. DISPOSITION OF CRUELLY TREATED ANIMALS

Sec. 821.021. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Cruelly treated" includes tortured, seriously overworked, unreasonably abandoned, unreasonably deprived of necessary food, care, or shelter, cruelly confined, caused to fight with another animal, or subjected to conduct prohibited by Section 21.09, Penal Code.

(2) "Nonprofit animal welfare organization" means a nonprofit organization that has as its purpose:

(A) the prevention of cruelty to animals; or

(B) the sheltering of, caring for, and providing homes for lost, stray, and abandoned animals.

(3) "Owner" includes a person who owns or has custody or control of an animal.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 963), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 739 (S.B. 1232), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2017.

Text of section effective until January 01, 2025

Sec. 821.0211. ADDITIONAL DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "magistrate" means any officer as defined in Article 2.09, Code of Criminal Procedure, except that the term does not include justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of criminal appeals, or courts of appeals, judges or associate judges of statutory probate courts, or judges or associate judges of district courts that give preference to family law matters or family district courts under Subchapter D, Chapter 24, Government Code.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1043, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 334 (H.B. 890), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.126, eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on January 01, 2025

Sec. 821.0211. ADDITIONAL DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "magistrate" means any officer as defined in Article 2A.151, Code of Criminal Procedure, except that the term does not include justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of criminal appeals, or courts of appeals, judges or associate judges of statutory probate courts, or judges or associate judges of district courts that give preference to family law matters or family district courts under Subchapter D, Chapter 24, Government Code.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1043, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 334 (H.B. 890), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.126, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 821.022. SEIZURE OF CRUELLY TREATED ANIMAL. (a) If a peace officer or an officer who has responsibility for animal control in a county or municipality has reason to believe that an animal has been or is being cruelly treated, the officer may apply to a justice court or magistrate in the county or to a municipal court in the municipality in which the animal is located for a warrant to seize the animal.

(b) On a showing of probable cause to believe that the animal has been or is being cruelly treated, the court or magistrate shall issue the warrant and set a time within 10 calendar days of the date of issuance for a hearing in the appropriate justice court or municipal court to determine whether the animal has been cruelly treated.

(c) The officer executing the warrant shall cause the animal to be impounded and shall give written notice to the owner of the animal of the time and place of the hearing.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 387, Sec. 1, eff. June 7, 1991; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1043, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 821.023. HEARING; ORDER OF DISPOSITION OR RETURN OF ANIMAL. (a) A finding in a court of competent jurisdiction that the owner of an animal is guilty of an offense under Section 42.09 or 42.092, Penal Code, involving the animal is prima facie evidence at a hearing authorized by Section 821.022 that the animal has been cruelly treated.

(a-1) A finding in a court of competent jurisdiction that a person is guilty of an offense under Section 21.09, Penal Code, is prima facie evidence at a hearing authorized by Section 821.022 that any animal in the person's possession has been cruelly treated, regardless of whether the animal was subjected to conduct prohibited by Section 21.09, Penal Code.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 576 (S.B. 762), Sec. 2, and Ch. 739 (S.B. 1232), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2017.

(c) Each interested party is entitled to an opportunity to present evidence at the hearing.

(d) If the court finds that the animal's owner has cruelly treated the animal, the owner shall be divested of ownership of the animal, and the court shall:

(1) order a public sale of the animal by auction;

(2) order the animal given to a municipal or county animal shelter or a nonprofit animal welfare organization; or

(3) order the animal humanely destroyed if the court decides that the best interests of the animal or that the public health and safety would be served by doing so.

(e) After a court finds that an animal's owner has cruelly treated the animal, the court shall order the owner to pay all court costs, including:

(1) the administrative costs of:

(A) investigation;

(B) expert witnesses; and

(C) conducting any public sale ordered by the court; and

(2) the costs incurred by a municipal or county animal shelter or a nonprofit animal welfare organization in:

(A) housing and caring for the animal during its impoundment; and

(B) humanely destroying the animal if destruction is ordered by the court.

(e-1) After a court finds that an animal's owner has cruelly treated the animal, the court shall determine the estimated costs likely to be incurred by a municipal or county animal shelter or a nonprofit animal welfare organization to house and care for the impounded animal during the appeal process.

(e-2) After making the determination under Subsection (e-1), the court at the time of entering the judgment shall set the amount of bond for an appeal equal to the sum of:

(1) the amount of the court costs ordered under Subsection (e); and

(2) the amount of the estimated costs determined under Subsection (e-1).

(e-3) A court may not require a person to provide a bond in an amount greater than or in addition to the amount determined by the court under Subsection (e-2) to perfect an appeal under Section 821.025.

(e-4) Notwithstanding any other law, the amount of court costs that a court may order under Subsection (e) and the amount of bond that a court determines under Subsection (e-2) are excluded in determining the court's jurisdiction under Subtitle A, Title 2, Government Code.

(f) The court may order that an animal disposed of under Subsection (d)(1) or (d)(2) be spayed or neutered at the cost of the receiving party.

(g) The court shall order the animal returned to the owner if the court does not find that the animal's owner has cruelly treated the animal.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 157, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 14.43, 14.44, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1043, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 886 (H.B. 2328), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 963), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 576 (S.B. 762), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 739 (S.B. 1232), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 739 (S.B. 1232), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 821.024. SALE OR DISPOSITION OF CRUELLY TREATED ANIMAL. (a) Notice of an auction ordered under this subchapter must be posted on a public bulletin board where other public notices are posted for the county or municipality. At the auction, a bid by the former owner of a cruelly treated animal or the owner's representative may not be accepted.

(b) Proceeds from the sale of the animal shall be applied first to any costs owed by the former owner under Section 821.023(e). The officer conducting the auction shall pay any excess proceeds to the justice or municipal court ordering the auction. The court shall return the excess proceeds to the former owner of the animal.

(c) If the officer is unable to sell the animal at auction, the officer may cause the animal to be humanely destroyed or may give the animal to a municipal or county animal shelter or a nonprofit animal welfare organization.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 387, Sec. 2, eff. June 7, 1991; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1043, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 963), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 821.025. APPEAL. (a) An owner divested of ownership of an animal under Section 821.023 may appeal the order to a county court or county court at law in the county in which the justice or municipal court is located.

(b) As a condition of perfecting an appeal, not later than the 10th calendar day after the date the order is issued, the owner must file a notice of appeal and a cash bond or surety bond in an amount set by the court under Section 821.023(e-2).

(c) Not later than the fifth calendar day after the date the notice of appeal and bond is filed, the court from which the appeal is taken shall deliver a copy of the clerk's record to the clerk of the county court or county court at law to which the appeal is made.

(d) Not later than the 10th calendar day after the date the county court or county court at law, as appropriate, receives a copy of the clerk's record, the court shall consider the matter de novo and dispose of the appeal. A party to the appeal is entitled to a jury trial on request.

(e) The decision of the county court or county court at law under this section is final and may not be further appealed.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 30.00014, Government Code, or any other law, a person filing an appeal from a municipal court under Subsection (a) is not required to file a motion for a new trial to perfect an appeal.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, a county court or a county court at law has jurisdiction to hear an appeal filed under this section.

(h) While an appeal under this section is pending, the animal may not be:

(1) sold or given away as provided by Sections 821.023 and 821.024; or

(2) destroyed, except under circumstances which would require the humane destruction of the animal to prevent undue pain to or suffering of the animal.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1043, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1351 (S.B. 408), Sec. 11(a), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 963), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 821.026. CONFLICT OF LAWS. In the event of a conflict between this subchapter and another provision of any other law relating to an appeal of a disposition regarding a cruelly treated animal, including the bond required for that appeal, this subchapter controls.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 963), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER C. EUTHANASIA OF ANIMALS

Sec. 821.051. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Animal" has the meaning assigned by Section 821.001.

(2) "Animal shelter" means a facility that collects, impounds, or keeps stray, homeless, abandoned, or unwanted animals.

(3) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1, Sec. 3.1639(118), eff. April 2, 2015.

(4) "Department" means the Department of State Health Services.

(5) "Executive commissioner" means the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 30, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 23 (S.B. 360), Sec. 1, eff. May 10, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1639(118), eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 821.052. METHODS OF EUTHANASIA. (a) A person may euthanize a dog or cat in the custody of an animal shelter only by administering sodium pentobarbital.

(b) A person may euthanize all other animals in the custody of an animal shelter, including birds and reptiles, only in accordance with the applicable methods, recommendations, and procedures set forth in the edition of the American Veterinary Medical Association Guidelines for the Euthanasia of Animals that is approved by the executive commissioner.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 30, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 23 (S.B. 360), Sec. 2, eff. May 10, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1594, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 821.053. REQUIREMENTS FOR USE OF SODIUM PENTOBARBITAL. (a) The executive commissioner by rule shall establish the requirements and procedures for administering sodium pentobarbital to euthanize an animal in the custody of an animal shelter.

(b) A person may administer sodium pentobarbital to euthanize an animal in the custody of an animal shelter only in accordance with the requirements and procedures established by department rule.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 30, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1595, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 821.054. REQUIREMENTS FOR USE OF COMMERCIALLY COMPRESSED CARBON MONOXIDE. (a) The executive commissioner by rule shall establish:

(1) standards for a carbon monoxide chamber used to euthanize an animal to which Section 821.052(b) applies; and

(2) requirements and procedures for administering commercially compressed carbon monoxide to euthanize an animal to which Section 821.052(b) applies.

(b) A person administering commercially compressed carbon monoxide to euthanize an animal to which Section 821.052(b) applies:

(1) may use only a carbon monoxide chamber that meets the standards established by department rule; and

(2) may administer the commercially compressed carbon monoxide only in accordance with the requirements and procedures established by department rule.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 30, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 23 (S.B. 360), Sec. 3, eff. May 10, 2013.

Sec. 821.055. TRAINING FOR EUTHANASIA TECHNICIANS. (a) A person may not euthanize an animal in the custody of an animal shelter unless the person has successfully completed, not more than three years before the date the person euthanizes the animal, a training course in the proper methods and techniques for euthanizing animals. The training course curriculum must include:

(1) the pharmacology, proper administration, and storage of euthanasia solutions;

(2) federal and state law regulating the storage and accountability of euthanasia solutions;

(3) euthanasia technician stress management;

(4) proper restraint and handling of an animal during euthanasia;

(5) the procedures for administering commercially compressed carbon monoxide to an animal;

(6) techniques for verifying an animal's death; and

(7) the proper disposal of a euthanized animal.

(b) The department must approve the sponsors and curriculum of the training course required by this section.

(c) This section does not apply to a person licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state.

(d) Notwithstanding Subsection (a), an employee of an animal shelter is not required to have successfully completed the training course before the 120th day following the date of initial employment.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 30, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2005.

Sec. 821.056. OFFENSE AND PENALTY. (a) A person commits an offense if the person violates this subchapter or a rule adopted under this subchapter.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 30, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1596, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 821.057. INJUNCTION. A court of competent jurisdiction, on the petition of any person, may prohibit by injunction the substantial violation of this subchapter or a rule adopted under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 30, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1597, eff. April 2, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER E. UNLAWFUL RESTRAINT OF DOG

Sec. 821.101. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Adequate shelter" means a sturdy structure:

(A) that provides the dog protection from inclement weather; and

(B) with dimensions that allow the dog while in the shelter to stand erect, sit, turn around, and lie down in a normal position.

(2) "Collar" means a band of material specifically designed to be placed around the neck of a dog.

(3) "Harness" means a set of straps constructed of nylon, leather, or similar material, specifically designed to restrain or control a dog.

(4) "Inclement weather" includes rain, hail, sleet, snow, high winds, extreme low temperatures, or extreme high temperatures.

(5) "Owner" means a person who owns or has custody or control of a dog.

(6) "Properly fitted" means, with respect to a collar or harness, a collar or harness that:

(A) is appropriately sized for the dog based on the dog's measurements and body weight;

(B) does not choke the dog or impede the dog's normal breathing or swallowing; and

(C) does not cause pain or injury to the dog.

(7) "Restraint" means a chain, rope, tether, leash, cable, or other device that attaches a dog to a stationary object or trolley system.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 5), Sec. 1, eff. January 18, 2022.

Sec. 821.102. UNLAWFUL RESTRAINT OF DOG; OFFENSE. (a) An owner may not leave a dog outside and unattended by use of a restraint unless the owner provides the dog access to:

(1) adequate shelter;

(2) an area that allows the dog to avoid standing water and exposure to excessive animal waste;

(3) shade from direct sunlight; and

(4) potable water.

(b) An owner may not restrain a dog outside and unattended by use of a restraint that:

(1) is a chain;

(2) has weights attached;

(3) is shorter in length than the greater of:

(A) five times the length of the dog, as measured from the tip of the dog's nose to the base of the dog's tail; or

(B) 10 feet; or

(4) is attached to a collar or harness not properly fitted.

(c) A person commits an offense if the person knowingly violates this section. The restraint of each dog that is in violation is a separate offense.

(d) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor, except that the offense is a Class B misdemeanor if the person has previously been convicted under this section.

(e) If conduct constituting an offense under this section also constitutes an offense under any other law, the actor may be prosecuted under this section, the other law, or both.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 5), Sec. 1, eff. January 18, 2022.

Sec. 821.103. EXCEPTIONS. (a) Section 821.102 does not apply to:

(1) the use of a restraint on a dog in a public camping or recreational area in compliance with the requirements of the public camping or recreational area as defined by a federal, state, or local authority or jurisdiction;

(2) the use of a restraint on a dog while the owner and dog engage in, or actively train for, an activity conducted under a valid license issued by this state provided the activity is associated with the use or presence of a dog;

(3) the use of a restraint on a dog while the owner and dog engage in conduct directly related to the business of shepherding or herding cattle or livestock;

(4) the use of a restraint on a dog while the owner and dog engage in conduct directly related to the business of cultivating agricultural products;

(5) a dog left unattended in an open-air truck bed only for the time reasonably necessary for the owner to complete a temporary task that requires the dog to be left unattended in the truck bed;

(6) a dog taken by the owner, or another person with the owner's permission, from the owner's residence or property and restrained by the owner or the person for not longer than the time necessary for the owner to engage in an activity that requires the dog to be temporarily restrained; or

(7) a dog restrained while the owner and dog are engaged in, or actively training for, hunting or field trialing.

(b) Section 821.102(b)(3) does not apply to a restraint attached to a trolley system that allows a dog to move along a running line for a distance equal to or greater than the lengths specified under that subdivision.

(c) This subchapter does not prohibit a person from walking a dog with a handheld leash.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 5), Sec. 1, eff. January 18, 2022.

Sec. 821.104. EFFECT OF SUBCHAPTER ON OTHER LAW. This subchapter does not preempt a local regulation relating to the restraint of a dog or affect the authority of a political subdivision to adopt or enforce an ordinance or requirement relating to the restraint of a dog if the regulation, ordinance, or requirement:

(1) is compatible with and equal to or more stringent than a requirement prescribed by this subchapter; or

(2) relates to an issue not specifically addressed by this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 5), Sec. 1, eff. January 18, 2022.